Wisconsin, session 2025, AB316.
do enact as follows:AB316,14Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 5insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table AB316,26Section 2. 20.255 (2) (fi) of the statutes is created to read:AB316,2,9720.255 (2) (fi) LGBTQIA+ rights training grants. The amounts in the 8schedule for grants under s. 115.403 (2) for training in LGBTQIA+ rights for school 9counselors and school social workers.AB316,310Section 3. 115.403 of the statutes is created to read:AB316,2,1311115.403 LGBTQIA+ rights training grants. (1) In this section, 12“LGBTQIA+” means lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, queer, intersex, or any 13other nonheterosexual or noncisgender orientation, identity, or expression.AB316,2,1714(2) The department shall award grants to school boards to provide training on 15the rights of LGBTQIA+ individuals, in a program developed or approved by the 16department, to school counselors and school social workers employed by a school 17board.AB316,418Section 4. Effective date.AB316,2,2019(1) This act takes effect on the day after publication, or on the 2nd day after 20publication of the 2025 biennial budget act, whichever is later.AB316,2,2121